lexd_components/hye-eanc_names.lexd
LEXICON NameFamily
Մառ:Մառ
Պուշկին:Պուշկին
Շիրվանզադե:Շիրվանզադե
Շևարդնաձե:Շևարդնաձե
Աբաշիձե:Աբաշիձե
Սաակաշվիլի:Սաակաշվիլի
Սահակաշվիլի:Սահակաշվիլի
Ջեննի:Ջեննի
Տոլստոյ:Տոլստոյ
Էրդողան:Էրդողան
Բաբայան:Բաբայան
Եղիայան:Եղիայան
Աղայան:Աղայան
Եսայան:Եսայան
Արայան:Արայան
Շարայան:Շարայան
Զոհրաբյան:Զոհրաբյան
Հակոբյան:Հակոբյան
Սերոբյան:Սերոբյան
Քերոբյան:Քերոբյան
Ավագյան:Ավագյան
Վարագյան:Վարագյան
Արեգյան:Արեգյան
Լյուդվիգյան:Լյուդվիգյան
Փլունգյան:Փլունգյան
Գևորգյան:Գևորգյան
Մուրադյան:Մուրադյան
Արամազդյան:Արամազդյան
Արտավազդյան:Արտավազդյան
Շահգելդյան:Շահգելդյան
Նալբանդյան:Նալբանդյան
Երվանդյան:Երվանդյան
Ղևոնդյան:Ղևոնդյան
Նավասարդյան:Նավասարդյան
Էդվարդյան:Էդվարդյան
Ալավերդյան:Ալավերդյան
Խուրշուդյան:Խուրշուդյան
Բազեյան:Բազեյան
Պարթեյան:Պարթեյան
Վահեյան:Վահեյան
Եղիշեյան:Եղիշեյան
Վաչեյան:Վաչեյան
Մամբրեյան:Մամբրեյան
Թեքեյան:Թեքեյան
Հայկազյան:Հայկազյան
Ասքանազյան:Ասքանազյան
Այվազյան:Այվազյան
Շիրազյան:Շիրազյան
Թամրազյան:Թամրազյան
Փափազյան:Փափազյան
Հաբեթյան:Հաբեթյան
Սեթյան:Սեթյան
Մելիքսեթյան:Մելիքսեթյան
Տիրիթյան:Տիրիթյան
Դավթյան:Դավթյան
Հաբության:Հաբության
Նեմրության:Նեմրության
Վրեժյան:Վրեժյան
Բադալյան:Բադալյան
Նաղդալյան:Նաղդալյան
Աբելյան:Աբելյան
Սաղաթելյան:Սաղաթելյան
Եզեկիելյան:Եզեկիելյան
Դանիելյան:Դանիելյան
Գաբրիելյան:Գաբրիելյան
Իսրայելյան:Իսրայելյան
Միքայելյան:Միքայելյան
Ռաֆայելյան:Ռաֆայելյան
Գնելյան:Գնելյան
Սամվելյան:Սամվելյան
Մանվելյան:Մանվելյան
Էմանվելյան:Էմանվելյան
Առաքելյան:Առաքելյան
Զոլյան:Զոլյան
Թաթուլյան:Թաթուլյան
Փայլակյան:Փայլակյան
Ցոլակյան:Ցոլակյան
Մեխակյան:Մեխակյան
Սահակյան:Սահակյան
Իսահակյան:Իսահակյան
Ընձակյան:Ընձակյան
Հմայակյան:Հմայակյան
Արմենակյան:Արմենակյան
Վաղինակյան:Վաղինակյան
Արշակյան:Արշակյան
Գիսակյան:Գիսակյան
Միսակյան:Միսակյան
Արտակյան:Արտակյան
Սեդրակյան:Սեդրակյան
Շիրակյան:Շիրակյան
Սևակյան:Սևակյան
Նարեկյան:Նարեկյան
Համբիկյան:Համբիկյան
Ռուբիկյան:Ռուբիկյան
Գագիկյան:Գագիկյան
Չմշկիկյան:Չմշկիկյան
Անանիկյան:Անանիկյան
Երջանիկյան:Երջանիկյան
Վանիկյան:Վանիկյան
Ոստանիկյան:Ոստանիկյան
Անդրանիկյան:Անդրանիկյան
Բենիկյան:Բենիկյան
Դերենիկյան:Դերենիկյան
Ձոնիկյան:Ձոնիկյան
Գառնիկյան:Գառնիկյան
Թոռնիկյան:Թոռնիկյան
Մյասնիկյան:Մյասնիկյան
Խաչիկյան:Խաչիկյան
Վաչիկյան:Վաչիկյան
Քաջիկյան:Քաջիկյան
Ջոջիկյան:Ջոջիկյան
Հովիկյան:Հովիկյան
Մարտիկյան:Մարտիկյան
Ժիրիկյան:Ժիրիկյան
Զորիկյան:Զորիկյան
Նորիկյան:Նորիկյան
Պատրիկյան:Պատրիկյան
Սուրիկյան:Սուրիկյան
Ռաֆիկյան:Ռաֆիկյան
Հայկյան:Հայկյան
Սունդուկյան:Սունդուկյան
Մանուկյան:Մանուկյան
Ծառուկյան:Ծառուկյան
Վռամշապուհյան:Վռամշապուհյան
Բուդաղյան:Բուդաղյան
Աբեղյան:Աբեղյան
Մուշեղյան:Մուշեղյան
Բարսեղյան:Բարսեղյան
Բարդուղյան:Բարդուղյան
Վահրիճյան:Վահրիճյան
Պերճյան:Պերճյան
Դեմիրճյան:Դեմիրճյան
Ադամյան:Ադամյան
Աբրահամյան:Աբրահամյան
Գեղամյան:Գեղամյան
Արշամյան:Արշամյան
Վռամյան:Վռամյան
Ռուստամյան:Ռուստամյան
Առուստամյան:Առուստամյան
Արամյան:Արամյան
Վահրամյան:Վահրամյան
Բաղրամյան:Բաղրամյան
Աճեմյան:Աճեմյան
Արտեմյան:Արտեմյան
Եփրեմյան:Եփրեմյան
Հովակիմյան:Հովակիմյան
Թորգոմյան:Թորգոմյան
Աբիսողոմյան:Աբիսողոմյան
Ռոստոմյան:Ռոստոմյան
Ամբակումյան:Ամբակումյան
Շահումյան:Շահումյան
Համբարձումյան:Համբարձումյան
Մկրտումյան:Մկրտումյան
Վաչագանյան:Վաչագանյան
Վարդանյան:Վարդանյան
Նաթանյան:Նաթանյան
Մերուաժանյան:Մերուաժանյան
Ղափլանյան:Ղափլանյան
Իշխանյան:Իշխանյան
Պատվականյան:Պատվականյան
Մնացականյան:Մնացականյան
Ոսկանյան:Ոսկանյան
Օսկանյան:Օսկանյան
Վահանյան:Վահանյան
Հովհանյան:Հովհանյան
Օհանյան:Օհանյան
Արզումանյան:Արզումանյան
Թումանյան:Թումանյան
Մաղաքյանյան:Մաղաքյանյան
Անանյան:Անանյան
Հունանյան:Հունանյան
Նշանյան:Նշանյան
Առուշանյան:Առուշանյան
Բաբաջանյան:Բաբաջանյան
Սասանյան:Սասանյան
Ալեքսանյան:Ալեքսանյան
Վանյան:Վանյան
Անուշավանյան:Անուշավանյան
Տիգրանյան:Տիգրանյան
Միհրանյան:Միհրանյան
Վարդևանյան:Վարդևանյան
Ստեփանյան:Ստեփանյան
Սիփանյան:Սիփանյան
Վահագնյան:Վահագնյան
Ռուբենյան:Ռուբենյան
Վազգենյան:Վազգենյան
Վիգենյան:Վիգենյան
Գուրգենյան:Գուրգենյան
Բաբկենյան:Բաբկենյան
Արսենյան:Արսենյան
Զավենյան:Զավենյան
Կարենյան:Կարենյան
Խորենյան:Խորենյան
Սուրենյան:Սուրենյան
Դարբինյան:Դարբինյան
Գարեգինյան:Գարեգինյան
Շահինյան:Շահինյան
Բենիամինյան:Բենիամինյան
Պիոնյան:Պիոնյան
Մամիկոնյան:Մամիկոնյան
Սիմոնյան:Սիմոնյան
Սողոմոնյան:Սողոմոնյան
Սամսոնյան:Սամսոնյան
Շմավոնյան:Շմավոնյան
Արոնյան:Արոնյան
Ահարոնյան:Ահարոնյան
Պարոնյան:Պարոնյան
Տարոնյան:Տարոնյան
Լևոնյան:Լևոնյան
Մելքոնյան:Մելքոնյան
Հայկազունյան:Հայկազունյան
Հարությունյան:Հարությունյան
Գարունյան:Գարունյան
Արծրունյան:Արծրունյան
Պռոշյան:Պռոշյան
Վաղարշյան:Վաղարշյան
Շավարշյան:Շավարշյան
Մուշյան:Մուշյան
Սադոյան:Սադոյան
Միրզոյան:Միրզոյան
Միկոյան:Միկոյան
Վաղոյան:Վաղոյան
Համոյան:Համոյան
Կարոյան:Կարոյան
Սարոյան:Սարոյան
Մկրտչյան:Մկրտչյան
Մուկուչյան:Մուկուչյան
Պապյան:Պապյան
Մեսրոպյան:Մեսրոպյան
Համազասպյան:Համազասպյան
Խանջյան:Խանջյան
Աճառյան:Աճառյան
Գոռյան:Գոռյան
Անդրեասյան:Անդրեասյան
Սուքիասյան:Սուքիասյան
Ղուկասյան:Ղուկասյան
Թովմասյան:Թովմասյան
Աթանասյան:Աթանասյան
Մանասյան:Մանասյան
Մինասյան:Մինասյան
Անաստասյան:Անաստասյան
Եզրասյան:Եզրասյան
Վարդգեսյան:Վարդգեսյան
Արիստակեսյան:Արիստակեսյան
Աթանեսյան:Աթանեսյան
Վրթանեսյան:Վրթանեսյան
Հովհաննեսյան:Հովհաննեսյան
Սարգիսյան:Սարգիսյան
Արամայիսյան:Արամայիսյան
Հովհաննիսյան:Հովհաննիսյան
Արտաշիսյան:Արտաշիսյան
Մասիսյան:Մասիսյան
Մովսիսյան:Մովսիսյան
Ներսիսյան:Ներսիսյան
Արշալույսյան:Արշալույսյան
Թեոդոսյան:Թեոդոսյան
Նարդոսյան:Նարդոսյան
Կարլոսյան:Կարլոսյան
Կիրակոսյան:Կիրակոսյան
Մարկոսյան:Մարկոսյան
Նիկողոսյան:Նիկողոսյան
Պողոսյան:Պողոսյան
Կադմոսյան:Կադմոսյան
Նիկողայոսյան:Նիկողայոսյան
Ռոմանոսյան:Ռոմանոսյան
Երանոսյան:Երանոսյան
Փանոսյան:Փանոսյան
Ստեփանոսյան:Ստեփանոսյան
Փիլիպոսյան:Փիլիպոսյան
Ղազարոսյան:Ղազարոսյան
Վարոսյան:Վարոսյան
Մարտիրոսյան:Մարտիրոսյան
Թեոդորոսյան:Թեոդորոսյան
Թորոսյան:Թորոսյան
Պետրոսյան:Պետրոսյան
Թադևոսյան:Թադևոսյան
Մաթևոսյան:Մաթևոսյան
Խոսրովյան:Խոսրովյան
Սմբատյան:Սմբատյան
Վարազդատյան:Վարազդատյան
Միհրդատյան:Միհրդատյան
Տրդատյան:Տրդատյան
Ազատյան:Ազատյան
Տաճատյան:Տաճատյան
Դրաստամատյան:Դրաստամատյան
Արարատյան:Արարատյան
Բագրատյան:Բագրատյան
Նահապետյան:Նահապետյան
Տոնապետյան:Տոնապետյան
Կարապետյան:Կարապետյան
Հայրապետյան:Հայրապետյան
Ասպետյան:Ասպետյան
Լիպարիտյան:Լիպարիտյան
Պանդուխտյան:Պանդուխտյան
Հրանտյան:Հրանտյան
Աշոտյան:Աշոտյան
Գալստյան:Գալստյան
Ալբերտյան:Ալբերտյան
Ռոբերտյան:Ռոբերտյան
Գյուտյան:Գյուտյան
Նուբարյան:Նուբարյան
Աբգարյան:Աբգարյան
Մարգարյան:Մարգարյան
Սպանդարյան:Սպանդարյան
Զարյան:Զարյան
Եղիազարյան:Եղիազարյան
Ղազարյան:Ղազարյան
Նազարյան:Նազարյան
Մխիթարյան:Մխիթարյան
Սպենդիարյան:Սպենդիարյան
Մակարյան:Մակարյան
Քոչարյան:Քոչարյան
Մանուչարյան:Մանուչարյան
Գասպարյան:Գասպարյան
Սարյան:Սարյան
Բաղդասարյան:Բաղդասարյան
Սանասարյան:Սանասարյան
Զաքարյան:Զաքարյան
Սաֆարյան:Սաֆարյան
Մհերյան:Մհերյան
Խաչերյան:Խաչերյան
Լուսերյան:Լուսերյան
Նվերյան:Նվերյան
Տերյան:Տերյան
Արշավիրյան:Արշավիրյան
Մհրյան:Մհրյան
Ժիրայրյան:Ժիրայրյան
Տիրայրյան:Տիրայրյան
Նորայրյան:Նորայրյան
Պարույրյան:Պարույրյան
Վրույրյան:Վրույրյան
Գրիգորյան:Գրիգորյան
Զորյան:Զորյան
Քրիստափորյան:Քրիստափորյան
Ասրյան:Ասրյան
Աստվածատրյան:Աստվածատրյան
Խաչատրյան:Խաչատրյան
Ասատրյան:Ասատրյան
Ազնաուրյան:Ազնաուրյան
Դուրյան:Դուրյան
Ծատուրյան:Ծատուրյան
Մեծատուրյան:Մեծատուրյան
Տիրատուրյան:Տիրատուրյան
Երիցյան:Երիցյան
Պարգևյան:Պարգևյան
Հովսեփյան:Հովսեփյան
Դալլաքյան:Դալլաքյան
Միսաքյան:Միսաքյան
Սիրաքյան:Սիրաքյան
Մելիքյան:Մելիքյան
Ավետիքյան:Ավետիքյան
Ենոքյան:Ենոքյան
Ալիշան:Ալիշան
Ամունդսեն:Ամունդսեն
Ստալին:Ստալին
Լենին:Լենին
Պուտին:Պուտին
Հուսեյն:Հուսեյն
Լեփսիուս:Լեփսիուս
Չեխով:Չեխով
Ռասկոլնիկով:Ռասկոլնիկով
Ստախանով:Ստախանով
Փարաջանով:Փարաջանով
Գորբաչով:Գորբաչով
Խրուշչով:Խրուշչով
Բրյուսով:Բրյուսով
Մամեդյարով:Մամեդյարով
Սաֆարով:Սաֆարով
Շեքսպիր:Շեքսպիր
Շերենց:Շերենց
Ադոնց:Ադոնց
Բակունց:Բակունց
Ալիև:Ալիև
